Utah statutes.
70A-9a-335.   Accessions.
(1)  A security interest may be created in an accession and continues in
collateral that becomes an accession.
(2)  If a security interest is perfected when the collateral becomes an
accession, the security interest remains perfected in the collateral.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), the other provisions of
this part determine the priority of a security interest in an accession.
(4)  A security interest in an accession is subordinate to a security interest
in the whole which is perfected by compliance with the requirements of a
certificate-of-title statute under Subsection 70A-9a-311(2).
(5)  After default, subject to Part 6, a secured party may remove an accession
from other goods if the security interest in the accession has priority over
the claims of every person having an interest in the whole.
(6)  A secured party that removes an accession from other goods under
Subsection (5) shall promptly reimburse any holder of a security interest or
other lien on, or owner of, the whole or of the other goods, other than the
debtor, for the cost of repair of any physical injury to the whole or the
other goods.  The secured party need not reimburse the holder or owner for any
diminution in value of the whole or the other goods caused by the absence of
the accession removed or by any necessity for replacing it.  A person entitled
to reimbursement may refuse permission to remove until the secured party gives
adequate assurance for the performance of the obligation to reimburse.
